Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB763.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "food processing waste," "food 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 processing wastes used for agricultural purposes" and "normal farming operations" in section 103 of the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Agricultural operator." A person that has management control of a normal farming operation.* * *"Animal processing residuals." Residual materials in liquid or solid form generated in the slaughtering, processing or converting of poultry, livestock, fish, seafood, milk, meat or eggs into human food or animal feed.* * *"Commercial broker." A person that assumes temporary con trol or ownership of animal processing residuals or food processing residuals and directly or indirectly arranges for transport to and utilization at a normal farming operation or other location.* * *"Commercial hauler." A person that transports or land- applies animal processing residuals or food processing residuals as a contract agent for an agricultural operator or commercial broker under the direction of the operator or broker.* * *"Food processing [waste." Residual materials in liquid or solid form generated in the slaughtering of poultry and 20250SB0763PN0819 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 livestock, or in processing and converting fish, seafood, milk, meat, and eggs to food products; it also means residual] residuals." Residual materials generated in the processing, converting, or manufacturing of fruits, vegetables, crops and other commodities into [marketable food items] human food or animal feed.["Food processing wastes used for agricultural purposes." The use of food processing wastes in normal farming operations as defined in this section.]* * *"Land application system." A written, site-specific plan that incorporates best management practices for the use, storage and land application of animal processing res iduals or food processing residuals.* * *"Normal farming operations." The customary and generally accepted activities, practices and procedures that farms adopt, use, or engage in year after year in the production and preparation for market of poultry, livestock, and their products; and in the production, harvesting and preparation for market of agricultural, agronomic, horticultural, silvicultural and aquacultural crops and commodities; provided that such operations are conducted in compliance with applicable laws, and provided that the use or disposal of these materials will not pollute the air, water, or other natural resources of the Commonwealth. It includes the storage and utilization of agricultural [and food process wastes] waste, animal processing residuals and food processing residuals, screenings and sludges for animal feed, and includes the agricultural utilization of septic tank cleanings and sewage sludges which are generated 20250SB0763PN0819 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 off-site. It includes the management, collection, storage, transportation, use or disposal of manure, [other agricultural waste and food processing waste] agricultural waste, animal processing residuals and food processing residuals, screenings and sludges on land where such materials will improve the condition of the soil, the growth of crops, or in the restoration of the land for the same purposes.* * *Section 2. Section 104(17) and (18) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 104. Powers and duties of the department.The department in consultation with the Department of Health regarding matters of public health significance shall have the power and its duty shall be to:* * *(17) administer funds collected by the United States Government and granted to Pennsylvania for the purpose of closing, maintaining or monitoring abandoned or closed hazardous waste storage, treatment or disposal sites and for the purpose of action to abate or prevent pollution at such sites. If Congress has not authorized the collection of such funds within one year after the effective date of this act, or if the department finds that the funding program authorized is inadequate, the department shall transmit to the General Assembly within 15 months after the effective date of this act a proposal for the establishment of a fund in Pennsylvania comprised of surcharges collected from users of hazardous waste storage, treatment and disposal facilities excluding captive facilities in the Commonwealth. Such fund shall be proposed for the purpose of closing, maintaining or 20250SB0763PN0819 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 monitoring hazardous waste storage, treatment or disposal sites excluding captive facilities which have been abandoned or which have been closed for at least 20 years, and for the purpose of taking action to abate or prevent pollution at such closed or abandoned sites; [and](18) encourage the beneficial use or processing of municipal waste or residual waste when the department determines that such use does not harm or present a threat of harm to the health, safety or welfare of the people or environment of this Commonwealth. The department shall establish waste regulations to effectuate the beneficial use of municipal and residual waste, including regulations for the issuance of general permits for any category of beneficial use or processing of municipal waste or residual waste on a regional or Statewide basis in accordance with the regulations adopted by the Environmental Quality Board. The department may or may not require insurance under section 502(e) or bonds under section 505(a) for any general permit or class of general permits promulgated under this paragraph. Except with the written approval of the department, no waste may be stored for longer than one year. Residual wastes being stored shall be monitored for changes in physical and chemical properties, including leachability, pursuant to applicable regulations, by the person or municipality beneficially using or processing such waste. The department may require the submission of periodic analyses or other information to [insure] ensure that the quality of residual waste to be beneficially used or processed does not change. A municipality or person beneficially using or processing the residual waste shall immediately notify the department, upon 20250SB0763PN0819 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 forms provided by department, of any change in the physical or chemical properties of the residual waste, including leachability; and the department shall conduct an investigation and order necessary corrective action. Upon receipt of a signed, written complaint of any person whose health, safety or welfare may be adversely affected by a physical or chemical change in the properties of residual waste to be beneficially used or processed, including leachability, the department shall determine the validity of the complaint and take appropriate action[.];(19) in coordination with the Department of Agriculture and the State Conservation Commission, develop, maintain and update requirements for a land application system in accordance with the latest scientific research and evidence-based practices. Requirements shall be developed in accordance with section 509; and(20) regulate the storage, transfer and transportation of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals by commercial brokers and commercial haulers. In coordination with the Department of Agriculture and the State Conservation Commission, develop, maintain and update the requirements for the storage, transfer and transportation of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals by commercial brokers and commercial haulers. Requirements shall be developed in accordance with section 510. This paragraph shall not take effect until legislation is enacted to certify commercial haulers and commercial brokers of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals.Section 3. Section 501(a) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:20250SB0763PN0819 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 501. Permits and licenses required; transition scheme; reporting requirements.(a) It shall be unlawful for any person or municipality to use, or continue to use, their land or the land of any other person or municipality as a solid waste processing, storage, treatment or disposal area without first obtaining a permit from the department as required by this act[: Provided, however, That this].(a.1) This section shall not apply to the following:(1) The short-term storage of by-products which are utilized in the processing or manufacturing of other products, to the extent that such by-products are not hazardous, and do not create a public nuisance or adversely affect the air, water and other natural resources of the Commonwealth[: And provided further, however, That the provisions of this section shall not apply to agricultural waste].(2) Agricultural waste, animal processing residuals and food processing residuals produced in [the course of] normal farming operations [nor the].(3) The use of agricultural waste, animal processing residuals and food processing [wastes in the course of] residuals in normal farming operations provided that such [wastes] agricultural wastes, animal processing residuals or food processing residuals are not classified by the board as hazardous.(4) The use, storage and land application of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals in normal farming operations provided the use, storage and land application are in compliance with a land application system.20250SB0763PN0819 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Food processing residuals transported to a normal farming operation and used to feed livestock or poultry.* * *Section 4. Article V heading of the act is amended to read:ARTICLE VAPPLICATIONS [AND], PERMITS, REQUIREMENTS,PREEMPTION AND MITIGATIONSection 5. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 509. Requirements for animal processing residuals and food processing residuals . (a) Requirements developed under section 104(19) for the use, storage and land application of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals shall include the following:(1) Provisions for the use, storage and land application of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals in accordance with a land application system.(2) Provisions for recordkeeping for the use, storage and land application of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals.(3) Provisions for the use of site-specific best management practices to manage odor of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals.(4) Provisions for periodic evaluation of a land application system for animal processing residuals and food processing residuals.(b) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this section, the board shall promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The board may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:20250SB0763PN0819 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(c) The board's authority to adopt temporary regulations under subsection (b) shall expire two years after the effective date of this subsection. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law before the expiration of the temporary regulations under subsection (b).(d) The board may issue orders as are necessary to aid in the maintenance and updating of requirements under subsection (a). The orders shall expire 24 months after issuance or the effective date of amendments to the applicable regulations containing the content of the order, whichever first occurs. Any order issued under this subsection shall take effect upon notice unless the order specifies otherwise. An appeal of the order to the Environmental Hearing Board shall not act as a supersedeas, provided that, upon application for and cause shown, the hearing board may issue a supersedeas under the rules established by the hearing board.Section 510. Requirements for the storage, transfer and transport of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals by commercial brokers and commercial haulers.20250SB0763PN0819 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Requirements developed under section 104(20) for the storage, transfer and transport of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals by commercial brokers and commercial haulers shall include the following:(1) Provisions for determining the content of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals.(2) Provisions for the best practices to be used in the storage, transfer and transport of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals.(3) Provisions for recordkeeping for the storage, transfer and transport of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals.(b) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this section, the board shall promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The board may promulgate temporary regulations not subject to:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(c) The board's authority to adopt temporary regulations under subsection (b) shall expire two years after the effective date of this subsection. Regulations adopted after this period 20250SB0763PN0819 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be promulgated as provided by law before the expiration of the temporary regulations under subsection (b).(d) The board may issue orders as are necessary to aid in the maintenance and updating of requirements under subsection (a). The orders shall expire 24 months after issuance or the effective date of amendments to the applicable regulations containing the content of the order, whichever first occurs. Any order issued under this subsection shall take effect upon notice unless the order specifies otherwise. An appeal of the order to the Environmental Hearing Board shall not act as a supersedeas, provided that, upon application for and cause shown, the hearing board may issue a supersedeas under the rules established by the hearing board.Section 511. Preemption of local ordinances.The regulation of the use, storage, transfer, transport and land application of animal processing residuals and food processing residuals set forth in this act or any accompanying regulations are of Statewide concern and occupy the whole field of regulation, to the exclusion of all local regulations.Section 512. Mitigation.An agricultural operator that is properly using, storing or land-applying animal processing residuals or food processing residuals in compliance with the provisions of this act shall be given appropriate consideration as a mitigating factor in an action arising from the use, storage or land application of animal processing residuals or food processing residuals by the agricultural operator.Section 6. The provisions of 25 Pa. Code § 287.101(b)(2) are abrogated.Section 7. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250SB0763PN0819 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930